src/morphology/stems/altstem-nouns.lexc
!! Noun stem variation and allomorph selection
!! ~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~
!! The nominal stems were classified according to what is the stem variation
!! and what allomorphs they select. This section lists all the possible
!! variations and all their allomorph selections. Each class description gives
!! the keys that can be used when classifying new words, the examples of
!! inflection and negative examples for the most obvious missed allomorphs and
!! 
!! singular nominative, singular essive, singular inessive, plural essive,
!! plural elative, singular partitives, singular illatives, plural partitives
!! plural genitives, plural illatives and the compound forms.
!!

!! Noun stems without stem variation
!! ^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^
LEXICON N_TALO
!! The most basic noun stem does not have any stem internal variation and
!! uses few commonest allomorphs. The words in this class are either bisyllabic
!! or have one of common derivational suffixes sto, ...:
!! € talo, talo, house
!! € talona, talo, house
!! € talossa, talo, house
!! € taloina, talo, house
!! € taloista, talo, house
!! € taloa, talo, house
!! $ talota
!! € taloon, talo, house
!! $ taloseen
!! € taloja, talo, house
!! $ taloita, talo, house
!! € talojen, talo, house
!! $ taloiden
!! $ taloitten
!! € taloihin, talo, house
!! $ taloisiin
!! € talojuttu, talo#juttu, house thing
!! € talonjuttu, talon#juttu, house's thing
!! € talojenjuttu, talojen#juttu, houses' thing
0    N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0    N_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
0    N_BACK_PLURALS ;
0    N_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN ;
0    N_BACK_ILLATIVE_ON    ;
0    N_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA    ;
0    N_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN    ;
0    N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0    N_COMPOUND_0    ;
0    N_COMPOUND_N ;
0    N_COMPOUND_JEN ;


LEXICON N_ASU
!! The stems ending in u are also without variationm and the bisyllabic ones
!! have the same simple allomorph pattern:
!! € asu, asu, outfit
!! € asua, asu, outfit
!! € asuun, asu, outfit
!! € asuna, asu, outfit
!! € asussa, asu, outfit
!! € asuja, asu, outfit
!! € asujen, asu, outfit
!! € asuihin, asu, outfit
!! € asuina, asu, outfit
!! € asussa, asu, outfit
0    N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0    N_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
0    N_BACK_PLURALS ;
0    N_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN ;
0    N_BACK_ILLATIVE_UN    ;
0    N_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA    ;
0    N_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN    ;
0    N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0    N_COMPOUND_0    ;
0    N_COMPOUND_N ;
0    N_COMPOUND_JEN ;

LEXICON N_KÄRRY
!! € kärry
!! € kärryä
!! € kärryun
!! € kärrynä
!! € kärryssä
!! € kärryjä
!! € kärryjen
!! € kärryihin
!! € kärryinä
!! € kärryissä
0    N_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
0    N_FRONT_SINGULARS    ;
0    N_FRONT_PLURALS ;
0    N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä_ÄN ;
0    N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_YN    ;
0    N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_JÄ    ;
0    N_FRONT_GENITIVE_JEN    ;
0    N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0    N_COMPOUND_0    ;
0    N_COMPOUND_N ;
0    N_COMPOUND_JEN ;

LEXICON N_MÖMMÖ
!! € mömmö
!! € mömmöä
!! € mömmöön
!! € mömmönä
!! € mömmössä
!! € mömmöjä
!! € mömmöjen
!! € mömmöihin
!! € mömmöinä
!! € mömmöissä
0    N_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
0    N_FRONT_SINGULARS    ;
0    N_FRONT_PLURALS ;
0    N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä_ÄN ;
0    N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ÖN    ;
0    N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_JÄ    ;
0    N_FRONT_GENITIVE_JEN    ;
0    N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0    N_COMPOUND_0    ;
0    N_COMPOUND_N ;
0    N_COMPOUND_JEN ;


LEXICON N_UKKO
!
!! € ukko
!! € ukossa
!! € ukoista
!! € ukkoihin
0:ko      N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:ko      N_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
0:o    N_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS    ;
0:ko      N_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS ;
0:o    N_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS    ;
0:ko      N_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN ;
0:ko      N_BACK_ILLATIVE_ON    ;
0:ko      N_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA    ;
0:ko      N_FRONT_GENITIVE_JEN    ;
0:ko      N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:ko      N_COMPOUND_0    ;
0:o       N_COMPOUND_N ;
0:ko      N_COMPOUND_JEN ;


LEXICON N_TIKKU
!
!! € tikku
!! € tikussa
!! € tikuista
!! € tikkuihin
0:ku   N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:ku   N_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
0:u    N_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS    ;
0:ku   N_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS   ;
0:u    N_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS   ;
0:ku   N_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN ;
0:ku   N_BACK_ILLATIVE_UN    ;
0:ku   N_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA    ;
0:ku   N_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN    ;
0:ku   N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:ku      N_COMPOUND_0    ;
0:u       N_COMPOUND_N ;
0:ku      N_COMPOUND_JEN ;


LEXICON N_MYRKKY
!
!! € myrkky
!! € myrkyssä
!! € myrkyistä
!! € myrkkyihin
0:ky   N_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:ky   N_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
0:y    N_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS    ;
0:ky   N_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS ;
0:y    N_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS ;
0:ky   N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä_ÄN ;
0:ky   N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_YN    ;
0:ky   N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_JÄ    ;
0:ky   N_FRONT_GENITIVE_JEN    ;
0:ky   N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:ky      N_COMPOUND_0    ;
0:y       N_COMPOUND_N ;
0:ky      N_COMPOUND_JEN ;

LEXICON N_YÖKKÖ
!
!! € yökkö
!! € yökössä
!! € yököistä
!! € yökköihin
0:kö   N_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:kö   N_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
0:ö    N_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS    ;
0:kö   N_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS ;
0:ö    N_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS ;
0:kö   N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä_ÄN ;
0:kö   N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ÖN    ;
0:kö   N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_JÄ    ;
0:kö   N_FRONT_GENITIVE_JEN    ;
0:kö   N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:kö      N_COMPOUND_0    ;
0:ö       N_COMPOUND_N ;
0:kö      N_COMPOUND_JEN ;

LEXICON N_HAPPO
!
!! € happo
!! € hapossa
!! € hapoista
!! € happoihin
0:po      N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:po      N_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
0:o       N_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS    ;
0:po      N_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS ;
0:o       N_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS    ;
0:po      N_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN ;
0:po      N_BACK_ILLATIVE_ON    ;
0:po      N_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA    ;
0:po      N_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN    ;
0:po      N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:po      N_COMPOUND_0    ;
0:o       N_COMPOUND_N ;
0:po      N_COMPOUND_JEN ;


LEXICON N_LIPPU
!
!! € lippu
!! € lipussa
!! € lipuista
!! € lippuihin
0:pu   N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:pu   N_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
0:u    N_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS    ;
0:pu   N_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS   ;
0:u    N_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS   ;
0:pu   N_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN ;
0:pu   N_BACK_ILLATIVE_UN    ;
0:pu   N_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA    ;
0:pu   N_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN    ;
0:pu   N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:pu      N_COMPOUND_0    ;
0:u       N_COMPOUND_N ;
0:pu      N_COMPOUND_JEN ;


LEXICON N_RYYPPY
!
!! € ryyppy
!! € ryypyssä
!! € ryypyistä
!! € ryyppyihin
0:py   N_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:py   N_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
0:y    N_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS    ;
0:py   N_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS ;
0:y    N_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS ;
0:py   N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä_ÄN ;
0:py   N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_YN    ;
0:py   N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_JÄ    ;
0:py   N_FRONT_GENITIVE_JEN    ;
0:py   N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:py      N_COMPOUND_0    ;
0:y       N_COMPOUND_N ;
0:py      N_COMPOUND_JEN ;

LEXICON N_TÖRPPÖ
!
!! € törppö
!! € törpössä
!! € törpöistä
!! € törppöihin
0:pö   N_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:pö   N_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
0:ö    N_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS    ;
0:pö   N_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS ;
0:ö    N_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS ;
0:pö   N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä_ÄN ;
0:pö   N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ÖN    ;
0:pö   N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_JÄ    ;
0:pö   N_FRONT_GENITIVE_JEN    ;
0:pö   N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:pö      N_COMPOUND_0    ;
0:ö       N_COMPOUND_N ;
0:pö      N_COMPOUND_JEN ;

LEXICON N_HIRTTO
!
!! € hirtto
!! € hirtossa
!! € hirtoista
!! € hirttoihin
0:to      N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:to      N_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
0:o       N_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS    ;
0:to      N_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS ;
0:o       N_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS    ;
0:to      N_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN ;
0:to      N_BACK_ILLATIVE_ON    ;
0:to      N_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA    ;
0:to      N_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN    ;
0:to      N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:to      N_COMPOUND_0    ;
0:o       N_COMPOUND_N ;
0:to      N_COMPOUND_JEN ;


LEXICON N_TORTTU
!
!! € torttu
!! € tortussa
!! € tortuista
!! € torttuihin
0:tu   N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:tu   N_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
0:u    N_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS    ;
0:tu   N_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS   ;
0:u    N_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS   ;
0:tu   N_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN ;
0:tu   N_BACK_ILLATIVE_UN    ;
0:tu   N_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA    ;
0:tu   N_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN    ;
0:tu   N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:tu      N_COMPOUND_0    ;
0:u       N_COMPOUND_N ;
0:tu      N_COMPOUND_JEN ;


LEXICON N_PYTTY
!
!! € pytty
!! € pytyssä
!! € pytyistä
!! € pyttyihin
0:ty   N_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:ty   N_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
0:y    N_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS    ;
0:ty   N_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS ;
0:y    N_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS ;
0:ty   N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä_ÄN ;
0:ty   N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_YN    ;
0:ty   N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_JÄ    ;
0:ty   N_FRONT_GENITIVE_JEN    ;
0:ty   N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:ty      N_COMPOUND_0    ;
0:y       N_COMPOUND_N ;
0:ty      N_COMPOUND_JEN ;

LEXICON N_PÖNTTÖ
!
!! € pönttö
!! € pöntössä
!! € pöntöistä
!! € pönttöihin
0:tö   N_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:tö   N_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
0:ö    N_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS    ;
0:tö   N_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS ;
0:ö    N_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS ;
0:tö   N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä_ÄN ;
0:tö   N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ÖN    ;
0:tö   N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_JÄ    ;
0:tö   N_FRONT_GENITIVE_JEN    ;
0:tö   N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:tö      N_COMPOUND_0    ;
0:ö       N_COMPOUND_N ;
0:tö      N_COMPOUND_JEN ;


LEXICON N_TEKO
!! Between two vowels, the weak grade of k is optionally an apostrophe instead.
!! For k that is not optionally ’, use the variation class kk ~ k instead
!! (e.g. N_UKKO).
!! € teko
!! € teossa
!! € te’ossa
0:ko      N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:ko      N_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
0:o       N_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS    ;
0:’o      N_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS    ;
0:ko      N_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS ;
0:o       N_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS    ;
0:’o      N_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS    ;
0:ko      N_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN ;
0:ko      N_BACK_ILLATIVE_ON    ;
0:ko      N_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA    ;
0:ko      N_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN    ;
0:ko      N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:ko      N_COMPOUND_0    ;
0:’o      N_COMPOUND_N ;
0:o       N_COMPOUND_N ;
0:ko      N_COMPOUND_JEN ;


LEXICON N_MAKU
!
!! € maku
!! € maussa
!! € ma’ussa
0:ku   N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:ku   N_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
0:u    N_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS    ;
0:’u   N_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS    ;
0:ku   N_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS   ;
0:u    N_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS   ;
0:’u   N_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS   ;
0:ku   N_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN ;
0:ku   N_BACK_ILLATIVE_UN    ;
0:ku   N_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA    ;
0:ku   N_FRONT_GENITIVE_JEN    ;
0:ku   N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:ku      N_COMPOUND_0    ;
0:’u      N_COMPOUND_N ;
0:u       N_COMPOUND_N ;
0:ku      N_COMPOUND_JEN ;


LEXICON N_NÄKY
!
!! € näky
!! € näyssä
!! € nä’yssä
0:ky   N_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:ky   N_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
0:y    N_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS    ;
0:’y   N_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS    ;
0:ky   N_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS ;
0:y    N_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS ;
0:’y   N_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS ;
0:ky   N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä_ÄN ;
0:ky   N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_YN    ;
0:ky   N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_JÄ    ;
0:ky   N_FRONT_GENITIVE_JEN    ;
0:ky   N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:ky      N_COMPOUND_0    ;
0:’y      N_COMPOUND_N ;
0:y       N_COMPOUND_N ;
0:ky      N_COMPOUND_JEN ;

LEXICON N_NÄKÖ
!
!! € näkö
!! € näössä
!! € nä’össä
0:kö   N_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:kö   N_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
0:ö    N_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS    ;
0:’ö   N_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS  ;
0:kö   N_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS ;
0:ö    N_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS ;
0:’ö   N_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS ;
0:kö   N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä_ÄN ;
0:kö   N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ÖN    ;
0:kö   N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_JÄ    ;
0:kö   N_FRONT_GENITIVE_JEN    ;
0:kö   N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:kö      N_COMPOUND_0    ;
0:’ö      N_COMPOUND_N ;
0:ö       N_COMPOUND_N ;
0:kö      N_COMPOUND_JEN ;
